Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-644
Birth or death certificate; amendment; requirements.

A certificate or report that is amended under sections 71-635 to 71-644 shall indicate that it has been amended as provided by rules and regulations of the department. A record shall be maintained which identifies the evidence upon which the amendment was based, the date of the amendment, and the identity of the person making the amendment.

Laws 1971, LB 245, § 11;

Laws 1985, LB 42, § 24;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 59;

Laws 1994, LB 886, § 13;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 545;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 443.